Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 13. SPORTS, AMUSEMENTS, AND ENTERTAINMENT

SUBTITLE A-1. TEXAS RACING ACT

CHAPTER 2029. ALLOCATION OF RACING DAYS

SUBCHAPTER A. HORSE RACING

Sec. 2029.001. ALLOCATION OF HORSE RACING DAYS; PROHIBITED RACING DAYS. (a) The commission shall allocate the live and simulcast horse racing days for the conduct of live and simulcast racing at each racetrack.

(b) In allocating race dates under this section, the commission shall consider live race dates separately from simulcast race dates.

(c) The commission may prohibit racing on Sunday unless the prohibition would conflict with another provision of this subtitle.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2029.002. CHARITY DAYS. (a) The commission shall grant to each racetrack association additional horse racing days during a horse race meeting to be conducted as charity days. The commission shall grant to each class 1 racetrack and to each class 2 racetrack at least two and not more than five additional days.

(b) Each class 1 and class 2 racetrack shall conduct charity race days in accordance with this section.

(c) The commission shall ensure that races conducted by a racetrack association on a charity day are comparable in all respects, including the generation of revenue, to races conducted by that racetrack association on any other horse racing day.

(d) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the conduct of charity days.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2029.003. ACCESS TO RACES. (a) Each racetrack shall provide reasonable access to races for all breeds of horses as determined by the racetrack association through negotiations with the representative state horse breed registry with the final approval of the commission.

(b) In granting approval under Subsection (a), the commission shall consider:

(1) the availability of competitive horses;

(2) economic feasibility; and

(3) public interest.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. GREYHOUND RACING

Sec. 2029.051. NUMBER OF GREYHOUND RACING DAYS. A greyhound racetrack association is entitled to 300 evening performances and 150 matinee performances in a calendar year.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2029.052. CHARITY DAYS. (a) The commission shall grant not less than five additional greyhound racing days during a greyhound race meeting to be conducted as charity days.

(b) The commission shall ensure that races conducted by a racetrack association on a charity day are comparable in all respects, including the generation of revenue, to races conducted by that racetrack association on any other greyhound racing day.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the conduct of charity days.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 2029.053. SUBSTITUTE RACING DAYS OR ADDITIONAL RACES. If, for a reason beyond a greyhound racetrack association's control and not caused by the racetrack association's fault or neglect, it is impossible for the racetrack association to conduct a race on a day authorized by the commission, the commission in its discretion and at the request of the racetrack association, as a substitute for the race, may:

(1) specify another day for the racetrack association to conduct racing; or

(2) add additional races to already programmed events.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 963 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.